North Dakota, session 69, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES. During the
2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study jails and regional correctional centers,
including their current and projected infrastructure needs, the costs and benefits of regional correctional
facilities, the impacts of deferred admission, and the prioritization of inmates sentenced to the
department of corrections and rehabilitation. The study must include input from representatives of
counties with a population of seven thousand five hundred or more, representatives of counties with a
population of fewer than seven thousand five hundred, representatives of local law enforcement
officials, representatives of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, representatives of the office
of management and budget, and representatives of the attorney general. The legislative management
shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1197 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1197.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 8 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State